en: MX-BIO-141
de: MX-BIO-141

en: PE-BIO-141
de: PE-BIO-141

en: PH-BIO-141
de: PH-BIO-141

en: TH-BIO-141
de: TH-BIO-141

en: TR-BIO-141
xx: TR-BIO-141

en: IN-BIO-134
xx: IN-BIO-134

en: TR-BIO-134
xx: TR-BIO-134

en: TR-BIO-135
xx: TR-BIO-135

en: TH-BIO-121
xx: TH-BIO-121

en: RS-BIO-162
xx: RS-BIO-162

en: TR-BIO-166
xx: TR-BIO-166

en: TR-BIO-179
xx: TR-BIO-179

en: TR-BIO-178
xx: TR-BIO-178

en: Soil Association Organic, Soil Association
ca: Soil Association, Soil Association Organic Standard
hr: Soil Association Organic
it: Associazione del Suolo Biologico

en: USDA Organic
ca: Orgànic segons la USDA
de: USDA Organic, National Organic Program, NOP
fi: USDA-luomu
it: Biologico USDA
nl: USDA Organic

en: CCOF certified organic, certified CCOF organic, California Certified Organic Farmers
fi: CCOF-sertifioitu luomu
pl: CCOF certified organic

en: Canada Organic, Biologique Canada Organic, Biologique Canada Canada Organic, Canada Organic Biologique Canada
fr: Biologique Canada, Biologique Canada Organic, Biologique Canada Canada Organic, Canada Organic Biologique Canada
it: Canada Organic, Biologique Canada
nl: Canada Biologisch, Canada Organic

en: Bioland
xx: Bioland

en: Naturland
xx: Naturland

en: Naturland Fair
xx: Naturland Fair